Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1
Limitations on Creditors’ Remedies

§ 28-45-101. Short title. — This chapter shall be known and may be cited as Idaho Credit Code

Remedies and Penalties.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-101, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-102. Scope.

This part applies to actions or other proceedings to enforce rights arising from regulated consumer credit transactions, to extortionate extensions of credit, section 28-45-109, Idaho Code, and to unconscionability, section 28-45-106, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-102, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-103. Restrictions on deficiency judgments.

This section applies to a regulated consumer credit sale of goods or services.

If the seller repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods which were the subject of the sale and in which he has a security interest and the cash price of the goods repossessed or surrendered was one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, the buyer is not personally liable to the seller for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale of the goods, and the seller is not obligated to resell the collateral.

If the seller repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods which were not the subject of the sale but in which he has a security interest to secure a debt arising from a sale of goods or services or a combined sale of goods and services and the cash price of the sale was one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, the buyer is not personally liable to the seller for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale.

For the purpose of determining the unpaid balance of consolidated debts or debts pursuant to open-end consumer credit, the allocation of payments to a debt shall be determined in the same manner as provided for determining the amount of debt secured by various security interests[,] section 28-43-303, Idaho Code.

The buyer may be liable in damages to the seller if the buyer has wrongfully damaged the collateral or if, after default and demand, the buyer has wrongfully failed to make the collateral available to the seller.

If the seller elects to bring an action against the buyer for a debt arising from a regulated consumer credit sale of goods or services, when under this section he would not be entitled to a deficiency judgment if he repossessed the collateral, and obtains judgment:

He may not repossess the collateral; and

The collateral is not subject to levy or sale on execution or similar proceedings pursuant to the judgment.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-103, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-104. Limitation on garnishment.

For the purposes of this part:

“Disposable earnings” means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of amounts required by law to be withheld; and

“Garnishment” means any legal or equitable procedure through which the earnings of an individual are required to be withheld for payment of a debt.

The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual for any work week which is subject to garnishment to enforce payment of a judgment arising from a regulated consumer credit sale or regulated consumer loan may not exceed the lesser of:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of his disposable earnings for that week; or

The amount by which his disposable earnings for that week exceed thirty (30) times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, U.S.C. title 29, section 206(a)(1), in effect at the time the earnings are payable.

In the case of earnings for a pay period other than a week, the director of the department of labor shall prescribe by rule a multiple of the federal minimum hourly wage equivalent in effect to that set forth in paragraph (b).

No court may make, execute, or enforce an order or process in violation of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-104, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 1996, ch. 421, § 22, p. 1406; am. 2000, ch. 267, § 1, p. 754.

§ 28-45-105. No discharge from employment for garnishment.

No employer shall discharge an employee for the reason that a creditor of the employee has subjected or attempted to subject unpaid earnings of the employee to garnishment or like proceedings directed to the employer for the purpose of paying a judgment arising from a regulated consumer credit transaction.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-105, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-106. Unconscionability.

With respect to a regulated consumer credit sale, or regulated consumer loan, if the court as a matter of law finds the agreement or any clause of the agreement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the agreement, or it may enforce the remainder of the agreement without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

If it is claimed or appears to the court that the agreement or any clause thereof may be unconscionable the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

For the purpose of this section, a charge or practice expressly permitted by this act is not in itself unconscionable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-106, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-107. Default.

An agreement of the parties to a regulated consumer credit transaction with respect to default on the part of the debtor is enforceable only to the extent that:

The debtor fails to make a payment as required by agreement; or

The prospect of payment, performance, or realization of collateral is significantly impaired; the burden of establishing the prospect of significant impairment is on the creditor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-107, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-108. Creditor’s right to take possession after default.

Upon default by a debtor with respect to a regulated consumer credit transaction, unless the debtor voluntarily surrenders possession of the collateral to the creditor, the creditor may take possession of the collateral without judicial process only if possession can be taken without entry into a dwelling and without the use of force or other breach of the peace.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-108, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-109. Extortionate extensions of credit.

If it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time an extension of credit is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation or property of the debtor(s) or of another person, the repayment of the extension of credit is unenforceable through civil judicial processes against the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-109, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.